Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.040

Injunction or attachment order—Persons violating RCW 19.330.020.

No injunction may issue against a person other than the person adjudicated to have violated RCW 19.330.020, and no attachment order may issue against articles or products other than articles or products in which the person alleged to violate RCW 19.330.020 holds title. A person other than the person alleged to violate RCW 19.330.020 includes any person other than the actual manufacturer who contracts with or otherwise engages another person to develop, manufacture, produce, market, distribute, advertise, or assemble an article or product alleged to violate RCW 19.330.020.

[ 2011 c 98 s 4.]